Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF476.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2579SV (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 476 Section 1. Section 249A.30A, Code 2025, is amended to read 1 as follows: 2 249A.30A Medical assistance ââ personal needs allowance. 3 1. The personal needs allowance under the medical 4 assistance program, which may be retained by a person who is a 5 resident of a nursing facility, an intermediate care facility 6 for persons with an intellectual disability, or an intermediate 7 care facility for persons with mental illness, as defined in 8 section 135C.1 , or a person who is a resident of a psychiatric 9 medical institution for children as defined in section 135H.1 , 10 shall be fifty sixty-five dollars per month. 11 2. A resident who has income of less than fifty sixty-five 12 dollars per month shall receive a supplement from the state in 13 the amount necessary to receive a personal needs allowance of 14 fifty sixty-five dollars per month. The general assembly shall 15 annually appropriate a sufficient amount from the general fund 16 of the state to the department of health and human services for 17 this purpose. 18 3. Beginning July 1, 2026, the department shall annually 19 increase the personal needs allowance by a percentage equal to 20 the annual percentage change in the United States department of 21 labor, bureau of statistics, consumer price index for all urban 22 consumers for the midwest region, all items, or a successor 23 index. The personal needs allowance shall not exceed one 24 hundred dollars per month. 25 4. The department shall review the personal needs 26 allowance, in consultation with the long-term care ombudsman, 27 and submit a report to the general assembly containing the 28 number of recipients and disbursements made under this section, 29 including any recommendations the department deems necessary. 30 Beginning the second Monday in January 2027, the department 31 shall biennially submit a report on or before the second Monday 32 in January. 33